Hawaii statutes.
§481M-12 Waivers. A lessor shall not
require a lessee to waive:

(1) Service of process;

(2) Any defense;

(3) Any counterclaim; or

(4) Right of action against the lessor or a person
acting on the lessor's behalf as the lessor's agent;

in collection of payments under the lease-purchase
agreement or in repossession of the leased property. [L 1997, c 248, pt
of §1; am L 2008, c 19, §32]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next